Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5100.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 11. (1) Within not more Not later than 30 days following
after appointment of the members of a board, the board shall hold
its first meeting at a date and time determined by the individual
appointed under section 9(1)(a). The board members shall elect from
among the board members an individual to serve as chairperson of
the board and may elect other officers as the board considers
necessary. All officers shall must be elected annually by the
board. All actions of the board under this act shall require the
unanimous consent of all serving members of the board. , excluding
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


any members prohibited from voting on an action due to a conflict
of interest under section 15.A vote in favor of an action of the
board by an alternate acting under subsection (13) is considered
the consent of a serving member for purposes of this subsection.
(2) The business of the board shall must be conducted at a
public meeting of the board held in compliance with the open
meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Public notice of
the time, date, and place of the meeting shall must be given in the
manner required by the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261
to 15.275. A board shall adopt bylaws consistent with the open
meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, governing its
procedures and the holding of meetings. After organization, a board
shall adopt a schedule of regular meetings and adopt a regular
meeting date, place, and time. A special meeting of the board may
be called by the chairperson of the board or as provided in bylaws
adopted by the board. Notice of a special meeting shall must be
given in the manner required by the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267,
MCL 15.261 to 15.275.
(3) A board shall keep a written or printed record of each
meeting. , which The record and any other document or record
prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the
authority in the performance of an official function shall must be
made available to the public in compliance with the freedom of
information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246.
(4) A board shall provide for a system of accounts for the
authority to conform to a uniform system required by law and for
the auditing of the accounts of an authority. The board shall
obtain an annual audit of the authority by an independent certified
public accountant and report on the audit and auditing procedures
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


in the manner provided by sections 6 to 13 of the uniform budgeting
and accounting act, 1968 PA 2, MCL 141.426 to 141.433. The audit
also shall must be in accordance with generally accepted government
auditing standards and shall must satisfy federal regulations
relating to federal grant compliance audit requirements.
(5) Before the beginning of each fiscal year, a board shall
cause to be prepared a budget for the authority containing an
itemized statement of the estimated current operational expenses
and the expenses for capital outlay including funds for the
operation and development of convention facilities under the
jurisdiction of the board, including the amount necessary to pay
the principal and interest of any outstanding bonds or other
obligations of the authority maturing during the next fiscal year
or that have previously matured and are unpaid, and an estimate of
the estimated revenue of the authority from all sources for the
next fiscal year. The board shall adopt a budget as for the fiscal
year in accordance with the uniform budget and accounting act, 1968
PA 2, MCL 141.421 to 141.440a.
(6) The board shall, by resolution, establish and maintain a
reserve fund for any purposes authorized by law, including to
address prior fiscal year shortfalls in distributions under section
10(2) of the state convention facility development act, 1985 PA
106, MCL 207.630, in the order of priority set forth in section
10(2) of the state convention facility development act, 1985 PA
106, MCL 207.630. The reserve fund may be funded from distributions
to the authority from the convention facility development fund
created in section 8 of the state convention facility development
act, 1985 PA 106, MCL 207.628, and from any other revenues of the
authority permitted by law. The reserve fund shall be separate from
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


and shall not be pledged as, or constitute, any debt service
reserve fund established under an indenture or other agreement for
authority indebtedness, and shall not be maintained in a manner
that conflicts with the authority's covenants or obligations
related to such indebtedness. The board shall designate an
investment fiduciary for the reserve fund and adopt an investment
policy for the reserve fund consistent with subsection (5).
(7) (6) A board shall provide for the purchase of, the
contracting for, and the providing of supplies, materials,
services, insurance, utilities, third-party financing, equipment,
printing, and all other items as needed by the authority to
efficiently and effectively meet the needs of the authority using
competitive procurement methods to secure the best value for the
authority. The board shall make all discretionary decisions
concerning the solicitation, award, amendment, cancellation, and
appeal of authority contracts. A board shall provide for the
acquisition of professional services, including, but not limited
to, architectural services, engineering services, surveying
services, accounting services, services related to the issuance of
bonds, and legal services, in accordance with a competitive,
qualifications-based selection process and procedure for the type
of professional service required by the authority. An authority is
not required to use competitive bidding when acquiring proprietary
services, equipment, or information available from a single source,
such as a software license agreement. An authority may enter into a
cooperative purchasing agreement with the federal government, this
state, or other public entities for the purchase of goods or
services necessary for the authority. An authority may enter into
lease purchases or installment purchases for periods not exceeding
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


the anticipated useful life of the items purchased unless otherwise
prohibited by law. In all purchases made by the authority, all
other things being equal, preference shall must be given first to
products manufactured or services offered by firms based in the
authority's qualified metropolitan area, including, but not limited
to, the qualified city and each county in the qualified
metropolitan area, and next to firms based in this state, if
consistent with applicable law. The authority shall actively
solicit lists of potential bidders for authority contracts from
each qualified city and each county in the qualified metropolitan
area. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the authority
shall utilize competitive solicitation for all purchases authorized
under this act unless 1 or more of the following apply:
(a) Procurement of goods or services is necessary for the
imminent protection of public health or safety or to mitigate an
imminent threat to public health or safety, as determined by the
authority or its chief executive officer.
(b) Procurement of goods or services is for emergency repair
or construction caused by unforeseen circumstances when the repair
or construction is necessary to protect life or property.
(c) Procurement of goods or services is in response to a
declared state of emergency or state of disaster under the
emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421.
(d) Procurement of goods or services is in response to a
declared state of emergency under 1945 PA 302, MCL 10.31 to 10.33.
(d) (e) Procurement of goods or services is in response to a
declared state of energy emergency under 1982 PA 191, MCL 10.81 to
10.89.
(e) (f) Procurement of goods or services is under a
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


cooperative purchasing agreement with the federal government, this
state, or more public entities for the purchase of goods and
services necessary at fair and reasonable prices using a
competitive procurement method for authority operations.
(f) (g) The value of the procurement is less than $5,000.00,
and the board has established policies or procedures to ensure that
goods or services with a value of less than $5,000.00 are purchased
by the board at fair and reasonable prices. Procurement of goods or
services with a value of less than $5,000.00 may be negotiated with
or without using competitive bidding as authorized in a procurement
policy adopted by the board.
(8) (7) A board may not enter into any cost plus construction
contract unless all of the following apply:
(a) The contract cost is less than $50,000.00.
(b) The contract is for emergency repair or construction
caused by unforeseen circumstances.
(c) The repair or construction is necessary to protect life or
property.
(d) The contract complies with requirements of applicable
state or federal law.
(9) (8) The board shall adopt a procurement policy consistent
with the requirements of this act and federal and state laws
relating to procurement. The procurement policy shall must include
a requirement for the authority to use its best efforts within the
competitive solicitation requirements of this section to achieve
fairness in the number and value of contracts for goods or services
entered into by the authority with firms based in the qualified
city and each county within the qualified metropolitan area,
consistent with applicable law. The board shall adopt a policy to
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


govern the control, supervision, management, and oversight of each
contract to which the authority is a party. The board shall adopt
procedures to monitor the performance of each contract including,
but not limited to, a contract that exists on the transfer date, to
assure execution of the contract within the budget and time periods
provided under the contract. The monitoring shall must include
oversight as to whether the contract is being performed in
compliance with the terms of the contract, this act, and federal
and state law procurement law. The chief executive officer or other
authorized employee of an authority shall not sign or execute a
contract until the contract is approved by the board. A board for
an authority shall establish policies to ensure that the authority
does not enter into a procurement or employment contract with a
person who has been convicted of a criminal offense incident to the
application for or performance of a contract or subcontract with a
governmental entity in this state. A board for an authority shall
establish policies to ensure that the authority does not enter into
a procurement or employment contract with a person who has been
convicted of a criminal offense, or held liable in a civil
proceeding, that negatively reflects on the person's business
integrity, based on a finding of embezzlement, theft, forgery,
bribery, falsification or destruction of records, receiving stolen
property, or violation of state or federal antitrust statutes, or
similar laws. The authority shall prepare an annual report to the
board, the qualified city, and each county within the qualified
metropolitan area detailing all contracts entered into by the
authority during the immediately preceding fiscal year. As used in
this subsection, if a person is a business entity, person includes
affiliates, subsidiaries, officers, directors, managerial
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


employees, and any person who, directly or indirectly, holds a
pecuniary interest in that business entity of 20% or more. Nothing
in this subsection shall must be construed as creating a quota or
set-aside for any qualified city or any county in the qualified
metropolitan area.
(10) (9) A board may employ personnel as the board considers
necessary to assist the board in performing the power, duties, and
jurisdictions of the authority, including, but not limited to,
employment of a chief executive officer as authorized under section
13. The board shall adopt an employment policy that includes a
requirement for the authority to use best efforts to achieve
fairness in the hiring of employees from among residents of the
qualified city and each county within the qualified metropolitan
area, consistent with applicable law. Nothing in this subsection
shall must be construed as creating a quota or set-aside for any
qualified city or any county in the qualified metropolitan area.
(11) (10) A board shall establish policies to assure that the
board and the authority shall do not do either of the following:
(a) Fail or refuse to hire, recruit, or promote; demote;
discharge; or otherwise discriminate against a person with respect
to employment, compensation, or a term, condition, or privilege of
employment, or a contract with the authority because of religion,
race, color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, height,
weight, marital status, partisan considerations, or a disability or
genetic information that is unrelated to the person's ability to
perform the duties of a particular job, position, or contract.
(b) Limit, segregate, or classify an employee, a contractor,
or applicant for employment or a contract in a way that deprives or
tends to deprive the employee, contractor, or applicant of an
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


employment opportunity or otherwise adversely affects the status of
an employee, contractor, or applicant because of religion, race,
color, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, height,
weight, marital status, partisan considerations, or a disability or
genetic information that is unrelated to the person's ability to
perform the duties of a particular job or position.
(12) (11) Not less than 60 days after the transfer date, an
authority shall establish a citizens advisory council to provide
public input and advise the board on the impact of redevelopment
and management of a qualified convention facility upon the
qualified city and each county within the qualified metropolitan
area. The advisory council shall consist of 8 members, including 1
resident of the qualified city appointed by the local chief
executive officer of the qualified city, 1 resident of the
qualified city appointed by the legislative body of the qualified
city, 1 county resident appointed as a council member by each local
chief executive officer for each county within the qualified
metropolitan area, and 1 county resident appointed as a council
member by the legislative body for each county within the qualified
metropolitan area. An elected state or local official is not
eligible to serve as a member of the citizens advisory council.
Members of the advisory council shall be appointed for terms of 4
years. A vacancy on the advisory council arising other than by
expiration of a term shall be filled for the remainder of a term in
the same manner as the original appointment. The business of the
advisory council shall must be conducted at a public meeting held
in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261
to 15.275. Public notice of the time, date, and place of the
meeting shall must be given in the manner required by the open
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. The advisory
council shall adopt bylaws consistent with the open meetings act,
1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, governing its procedures and the
holding of meetings. After organization, the advisory council shall
adopt a schedule of regular meetings and adopt a regular meeting
date, place, and time. The advisory council shall keep a written or
printed record of each meeting, which record and any other document
or record prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained
by the advisory council in the performance of an official function
shall must be made available to the public in compliance with the
freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. An
advisory council shall organize and make its own policies and
procedures and shall adopt bylaws not inconsistent with this act
governing its operations. The advisory council may request and
shall must receive from the authority information and technical
assistance relating to the development and management of the
qualified convention facility. Failure of the advisory council to
organize, meet, or perform statutory functions shall does not
prevent the board or the authority from performing authorized
activities. A member of the citizens advisory council shall must
not be compensated for being a member, nor shall and a member must
not be reimbursed for any expenses incurred as a member of the
citizens advisory council.
(13) The appointing authority for a board member described in
section 9(1) may appoint an alternate for that board member in the
same manner as the appointment of the board member. An alternate
may serve as a member of the board in the absence of the board
member if the board member will be unable to attend 1 or more
meetings or for the purpose of reaching a decision on a matter on
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46


which the board member is prohibited from voting due to a conflict
of interest under section 15. An alternate serving under this
subsection has the same powers, duties, and protections as the
board member for whom the alternate is serving and shall serve only
for the period of the absence or disqualification.
Final Page
ERE H02802'25 (H-3) ys8z46